Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 7
ENFORCEMENT - PENALTIES

Section

40-7-101. Enforcement of laws.

It is the duty of the commission to see that the constitution and statutes of this state affecting public utilities, and persons subject to article 10.1 or 10.5 of this title, the enforcement of which is not specifically vested in some other officer or tribunal, are enforced and obeyed and that violations thereof are promptly prosecuted and penalties due the state are recovered and collected, and to this end it may sue in the name of the people of the state of Colorado. Upon the request of the commission, the attorney general or the district attorney acting for the proper county or city and county shall aid in any investigation, hearing, or trial had under articles 1 to 7 of this title and institute and prosecute actions or proceedings for the enforcement of the constitution and statutes of this state affecting public utilities and persons subject to article 10.1 or 10.5 of this title and for the punishment of all violations thereof.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 503, § 57.

C.L.

§ 2966.

CSA:

C. 137, § 57.

CRS 53:

§ 115-7-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-7-1.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 420, § 16, effective August 10.

40-7-102. Liability for violations - punitive damages.

In case any public utility does, causes to be done, or permits to be done any act, matter, or thing prohibited, forbidden, or declared to be unlawful, or omits to do any act, matter, or thing required to be done, either by the state constitution, any law of this state, or any order or decision of the commission, such public utility shall be liable to the persons or corporations affected thereby for all loss, damage, or injury caused thereby or resulting therefrom. If the court finds that the act or omission was willful, the court, in addition to the actual damages, may award exemplary damages. An action to recover such loss, damage, or injury may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction by any corporation or person.

No recovery as provided in this section shall in any manner affect the recovery by the state of the penalties provided in articles 1 to 7 of this title.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 503, § 58.

C.L.

§ 2967.

CSA:

C. 137, § 58.

CRS 53:

§ 115-7-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-7-2.

40-7-103. Not to affect other rights - penalties cumulative.

The provisions of articles 1 to 7 of this title shall not have the effect of releasing or waiving any right of action by the state, the commission, or any person or corporation for any right, penalty, or forfeiture which may have arisen or accrued under any law of this state.

All penalties accruing under articles 1 to 7 of this title shall be cumulative of each other, and a suit for the recovery of one penalty shall not be a bar to nor affect the recovery of any other penalty or forfeiture nor be a bar to any criminal prosecution against any public utility, or any officer, director, agent, or employee thereof, or any other corporation or person.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 503, § 59.

C.L.

§ 2968.

CSA:

C. 137, § 59.

CRS 53:

§ 115-7-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-7-3.

40-7-104. Actions to restrain violations.

Whenever the commission is of the opinion that any public utility is failing or omitting to do anything required of it by law or by any order, decision, rule, direction, or requirement of the commission or is doing anything or about to do anything or permitting anything or about to permit anything to be done contrary to or in violation of law or of any order, decision, rule, direction, or requirement of the commission, it shall direct the attorney general to commence an action or proceeding in the district court in and for the county or city and county in which the cause or some part thereof arose, or in which the corporation or person complained of, if any, has its principal place of business, or in which the person, if any, complained of, resides, in the name of the people of the state of Colorado, for the purpose of having such violations or threatened violations stopped and prevented, either by mandamus or injunction.

The attorney general shall begin such action or proceeding by petition to such district court, alleging the violation or threatened violation complained of, and praying for appropriate relief by way of mandamus or injunction. It is the duty of the court to specify a time, not exceeding twenty days after the service of the copy of the petition, within which the public utility complained of must answer the petition, and in the meantime said public utility may be restrained. In case of default in answer or after answer, the court shall immediately inquire into the facts and circumstances of the case.

Such corporations or persons as the court may deem necessary or proper to be joined as parties, in order to make its judgment or order effective, may be joined as parties. The final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall either dismiss the action or proceeding or direct that an order in the nature of mandamus or injunction issue or be made permanent as prayed for in the petition or in such modified or other form as will afford appropriate relief. An appeal may be taken to the supreme court from such final judgment in the same manner and with the same effect, subject to the provisions of articles 1 to 7 of this title as appeals are taken from judgments of the district court in other actions for mandamus or injunction.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 504, § 60.

C.L.

§ 2969.

CSA:

C. 137, § 60.

CRS 53:

§ 115-7-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-7-4.

40-7-105. Violations - penalty - separate offenses.

Any public utility which violates or fails to comply with any provision of the state constitution or of articles 1 to 7 of this title or which fails, omits, or neglects to obey, observe, or comply with any order, decision, decree, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission or any part or provision thereof, except an order for the payment of money, in a case in which a penalty has not been provided for such public utility, is subject to a penalty of not more than two thousand dollars for each offense.

Every violation of the provisions of articles 1 to 7 of this title or of any order, decision, decree, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission or any part or portion thereof, except an order for the payment of money, by any corporation or person is a separate and distinct offense, and, in case of a continuing violation, each day's continuance thereof shall be deemed a separate and distinct offense.

In construing and enforcing the provisions of articles 1 to 7 of this title relating to penalties, the act, omission, or failure of any officer, agent, or employee of any public utility, acting within the scope of his official duties or employment, in every case shall be deemed the act, omission, or failure of such public utility.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 505, § 61.

C.L.

§ 2970.

CSA:

C. 137, § 61.

CRS 53:

§ 115-7-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-7-5.

40-7-106. Violations by agents - penalty.

Every officer, agent, or employee of any public utility who violates or fails to comply with or who procures, aids, or abets any violation by any public utility of any provision of the constitution of this state or of articles 1 to 7 of this title, or who fails to obey, observe, or comply with any order, decision, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission or any part or provision thereof, except an order for the payment of money, or who procures, aids, or abets any public utility in its failure to obey, observe, and comply with any such order, decision, rule, direction, demand, or requirement or any part or provision thereof in a case in which a penalty has not been provided for such officer, agent, or employee commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 505, § 62.

C.L.

§ 2971.

CSA:

C. 137, § 62.

CRS 53:

§ 115-7-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-7-6.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2068, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1558, § 355, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

40-7-107. Violations by corporations not public utilities - penalty.

Every corporation other than a public utility which violates any provision of articles 1 to 7 of this title or which fails to obey, observe, or comply with any order, decision, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission or any part or provision thereof, except an order for the payment of money, in a case in which a penalty has not been provided for such corporation is subject to a penalty of not more than two thousand dollars for each offense.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 506, § 63.

C.L.

§ 2972.

CSA:

C. 137, § 63.

CRS 53:

§ 115-7-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-7-7.

40-7-108. Violations by individuals - penalty.

Every person who, either individually or acting as an officer, agent, or employee of a corporation other than a public utility, violates any provision of articles 1 to 7 of this title 40 or who fails to observe, obey, or comply with any order, decision, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission or any part or portion thereof, or who procures, aids, or abets any such public utility in its violation of articles 1 to 7 of this title 40 or in its failure to obey, observe, or comply with any such order, decision, rule, direction, demand, or requirement or any part or portion thereof in a case in which a penalty has not been provided for such person commits a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 506, § 64.

C.L.

§ 2973.

CSA:

C. 137, § 64.

CRS 53:

§ 115-7-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-7-8.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2068, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1558, § 356, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3297, § 700, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

40-7-109. Action to recover penalties - fines paid to general fund.

Actions to recover penalties under this title may be brought in the name of the people of the state of Colorado in the district court in and for the county or city and county in which the cause or some part thereof arose, or in which the corporation complained of, if any, has its principal place of business, or in which the person, if any, complained of resides. Such action shall be commenced and prosecuted to final judgment by the attorney general as directed by the commission. In any such action, all penalties incurred up to the time of commencing the same may be sued for and recovered. In all such actions, the procedure and rules of evidence shall be the same as in ordinary civil actions, except as otherwise provided in this article. All fines and penalties recovered by the state in any such action, together with the costs thereof, shall be paid into the state treasury. Any such action may be compromised or discontinued on application of the commission upon such terms as the court shall approve and order.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 506, § 65.

C.L.

§ 2974.

CSA:

C. 137, § 65.

CRS 53:

§ 115-7-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-7-9.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1797, § 18, effective July 1.

40-7-110. Commission to represent people - when.

Repealed.

The commission has the power to appear and represent the interests and welfare of the people of the state of Colorado in all matters and proceedings involving any public utility or carrier pending before any officer, department, board, commission, or court of the United States, of any other state, or of this state and to intervene in, protest, resist, or advocate the granting or denial of any petition, application, complaint, or other proceeding, to examine witnesses and offer evidence in any proceeding affecting the people of this state or some portion thereof, as the public interest, convenience, or necessity may appear, and to initiate or participate in judicial proceedings involving the order or decision of any such officer, department, board, or commission.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 507, § 66.

C.L.

§ 2975.

CSA:

C. 137, § 66.

L. 45:

p. 534, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 115-7-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-7-10.

L. 2008:

(1) repealed, p. 1798, § 19, effective July 1.

40-7-111. Not to affect interstate or foreign commerce.

None of the provisions of articles 1 to 7 of this title, except when specifically so stated, shall apply or be construed to apply to commerce with foreign nations or commerce among the several states, except insofar as the same may be permitted under the provisions of the constitution of the United States and the acts of congress.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 508, § 68.

C.L.

§ 2976.

CSA:

C. 137, § 67.

CRS 53:

§ 115-7-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-7-11.

40-7-112. Applicability of civil penalties.

A person who operates or offers to operate as a motor carrier as defined in section 40-10.1-101; a motor carrier, motor private carrier, broker, freight forwarder, leasing company, or other person required to register under section 40-10.5-102; or a transportation network company required to obtain a permit under section 40-10.1-606 is subject to civil penalties as provided in this section and sections 40-7-113 to 40-7-116, in addition to any other sanctions that may be imposed pursuant to law.

The commission shall transmit all penalties it collects to the state treasurer, who shall credit them to the legal services offset fund created in section 40-7-118; except that the state treasurer shall credit one-half of any civil penalty imposed upon a motor carrier of household goods to the moving outreach fund created in section 40-10.1-509.

Subsections (3) to (5) of this section and the civil penalties provided in section 40-7-113 do not apply to persons transporting nuclear materials who commit violations of section 42-20-406 (3), 42-20-407, or 42-20-505, C.R.S., or to persons transporting hazardous materials who commit violations of section 42-20-204, C.R.S.

An owner or other person allowing a driver to operate a motor vehicle upon a highway in violation of a statute or rule for which a civil penalty may be imposed under section 40-7-113 (1) is subject to the civil penalties provided in section 40-7-113 if he or she knows or has reason to know that the driver is engaged in a violation.

An owner or other person who directs a driver to operate a motor vehicle upon a highway in violation of a statute or rule for which a civil penalty may be imposed under section 40-7-113 (1) is subject to the civil penalties provided in section 40-7-113.

Any civil penalty assessed against an owner or other person pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of this section is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any civil penalty against the actual driver of the vehicle, and any such penalty may be assessed upon the initial violation by the person.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1540, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1623, § 3, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 2570, § 94, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 1209, § 23, effective May 31.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 1058, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2380, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 782, § 74, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1095, § 7, effective August 7.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1982, § 120, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 420, § 17, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-189), ch. 365, p. 2126, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 14-125), ch. 323, p. 1408, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2017:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 17-180), ch. 281, p. 1531, § 1, effective August 9.

40-7-113. Civil penalties - fines.

In addition to any other penalty otherwise authorized by law and except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, any person who violates article 10.1 or 10.5 of this title 40 or any rule promulgated by the commission pursuant to article 10.1 or 10.5, which article or rule is applicable to the person, may be subject to fines as specified in the following paragraphs:

Any person who fails to carry the insurance required by law may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than eleven thousand dollars.

Any person who violates section 40-10.1-201 (1), 40-10.1-202 (1)(a), 40-10.1-302 (1)(a), 40-10.1-401 (1)(a), 40-10.1-502 (1)(a), or 40-10.1-702 (1)(a) may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than one thousand one hundred dollars.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 421, § 18, effective August 10, 2011.)

A person subject to section 40-10.1-111 who operates a motor vehicle without having paid the annual identification fee for any motor vehicle operated as required by section 40-10.1-111 may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than four hundred dollars.

and (f.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 421, § 18, effective August 10, 2011.)

A person who violates any provision of article 10.1 or 10.5 of this title 40 not enumerated in subsection (1)(a), (1)(b), or (1)(e) of this section, any rule promulgated by the commission pursuant to this title 40, or any safety rule adopted by the department of public safety relating to motor carriers as defined in section 40-10.1-101 may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than one thousand one hundred dollars; except that any person who violates a safety rule promulgated by the commission is subject to the civil penalties authorized pursuant to 49 CFR 386, subpart G, and associated appendices to part 386, as the subpart existed on January 1, 2017.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 421, § 18, effective August 10, 2011.)

The commission shall set the amount of the civil penalties to be assessed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section in rules.

If a person is assessed a civil penalty for a violation referenced in subsection (1) of this section occurring on a date within twenty-four months after a previous violation, the civil penalty assessed for the second violation may be up to two times the amount specified by rule for the violation.

If a person violates subsection (1) of this section three times within twenty-four months, the person may be assessed a civil penalty up to three times the amount specified by rule for the third violation and for each subsequent violation.

A person who fails to pay in full all civil penalties assessed by commission order under this section, subject to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., within thirty days after the due date established by the order may have his or her vehicle registration canceled by the department of revenue as specified in section 42-3-120 (4), C.R.S. Registration of a vehicle owned by the person for which the penalty was assessed may be denied until all penalties are paid or collected. Upon written notice from the commission, the department of revenue shall cancel the registration as specified in section 42-3-120 (4), C.R.S.

This subsection (5) applies to all vehicles, regardless of when purchased, on or after August 10, 2011.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1540, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 2069, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 95:

IP(1) and (1)(f) amended, p. 1209, § 24, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(1)(g) amended, p. 1549, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1)(f) amended, p. 1058, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(g) amended, p. 1281, § 61, effective June 5.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(f), and (1)(g) amended, p. 1703, § 15, effective May 14; (1)(f.5) added and (1)(g) amended, p. 2380, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

IP(1) amended, p. 1211, § 98, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

IP(1), (1)(e), and (1)(g) amended and (1)(h) added, p. 1096, § 8, effective August 7.

L. 2009:

(5) added, (HB 09-1230), ch. 232, p. 1067, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(f) amended, (HB 10-1167), ch. 125, p. 415, § 2, effective April 15.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 421, § 18, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(5)(a) amended, (SB 13-189), ch. 365, p. 2126, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(g), (3), and (4) amended, (SB 17-180), ch. 281, p. 1531, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2164, § 3, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(g) by Senate Bill 03-225 and House Bill 03-1289 were harmonized.

40-7-113.5. Civil penalties applicable to public utilities - exclusion from rate base.

In addition to any other penalty otherwise authorized by law and except as otherwise provided in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section, a public utility furnishing electric, gas, water, water and sewer, or telecommunications service that intentionally violates any provision of articles 1 to 7 or 15 of this title or of any rule or order of the commission pursuant to such articles, which provision is applicable to such utility, may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars; except that nothing in this subsection (1) shall be construed to authorize the imposition of civil penalties upon:

A cooperative electric association that has voted to exempt itself from regulation pursuant to section 40-9.5-103;

A cooperative telephone association;

A municipally owned utility; or

A nonprofit generation and transmission electric corporation or association.

Civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be paid and credited to the general fund, in addition to any other sanctions that may be imposed pursuant to law. The amount of any such penalties paid shall not be an allowable expense for rate-making purposes.

The commission shall adopt rules specifying the particular violations, and the amount of the civil penalties to be assessed for each violation, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

No public utility shall be assessed a civil penalty if the utility is already subject to an existing reparation due to a commission order, commission rule, or statutory provision for the same violation.

If any public utility receives a second civil penalty assessment for a violation of the same statute, rule, or order within one year after the first violation, the civil penalty assessed for the second violation shall be no greater than twice the amount specified by rule for such violation.

If any public utility receives more than two civil penalty assessments for violation of the same statute, rule, or order within one year, the civil penalty assessed for each such subsequent violation shall be no greater than three times the amount specified by rule for such violation.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the total amount of civil penalties assessed against one public utility under this section shall not exceed the lesser of the following:

One hundred fifty thousand dollars in any six-month period; or

In any twelve-month period, one percent of the utility's gross annual revenues from services regulated by the commission, based on the most recent fiscal year for which final revenue figures are available.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1798, § 20, effective July 1.

40-7-114. Applicability of civil penalties to owners, employers, or other persons. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1541, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 2070, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 416, § 3, effective August 10.

40-7-115. Each day a separate offense.

Each day in which a person violates any statute, rule, or order of the commission for which a civil penalty may be imposed under section 40-7-113 or 40-7-113.5 may constitute a separate offense.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1542, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1799, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 423, § 19, effective August 10.

40-7-116. Enforcement of civil penalties against carriers.

Investigative personnel of the commission, Colorado state patrol officers, and port of entry officers as defined in section 42-8-102 (3), C.R.S., have the authority to issue civil penalty assessments for the violations enumerated in sections 40-7-112 and 40-7-113. When a person is cited for the violation, the person operating the motor vehicle involved shall be given notice of the violation in the form of a civil penalty assessment notice.

The notice shall be tendered by the enforcement official, either in person or by certified mail, or by personal service by a person authorized to serve process under rule 4(d) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, and shall contain:

The name and address of the person cited for the violation;

A citation to the specific statute or rule alleged to have been violated;

A brief description of the alleged violation, the date and approximate location of the alleged violation, and the maximum penalty amounts prescribed for the violation;

The date of the notice;

A place for the person to execute a signed acknowledgment of receipt of the civil penalty assessment notice;

A place for the person to execute a signed acknowledgment of liability for the violation; and

Such other information as may be required by law to constitute notice of a complaint to appear for hearing if the prescribed penalty is not paid within ten days.

A cited person shall execute the signed acknowledgment of receipt of the civil penalty assessment notice. The acknowledgment of liability shall be executed at the time the person cited pays the prescribed penalty. The person cited shall pay the civil penalty specified for the violation involved at the office of the commission, either in person or by depositing the payment postpaid in the United States mail within ten days after the issuance of the citation.

If the person cited does not pay the prescribed penalty within ten days after the issuance of the notice, the civil penalty assessment notice constitutes a complaint to appear before the commission. The person cited shall contact the commission on or before the time and date specified in the notice to set the complaint for a hearing on the merits in accordance with section 40-6-109. If the person cited fails to contact the commission on or before the time and date specified, the commission shall set the complaint for hearing.

At the hearing, the commission has the burden of demonstrating a violation by a preponderance of the evidence.

A civil penalty assessment notice shall not be considered defective so as to provide cause for dismissal solely because of a defect in the content of such civil penalty assessment notice. Any defect in the content of a civil penalty assessment notice issued as described in subsection (1) of this section may be cured by a motion to amend the same filed with the commission prior to hearing on the merits. No such amendment shall be permitted if substantial rights of the person cited are prejudiced.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1542, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2070, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 1210, § 25, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1099, § 15, effective August 7.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 423, § 20, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 12-1019), ch. 135, p. 465, § 6, effective July 1.

40-7-116.5. Enforcement of civil penalties against public utilities.

The director of the commission or his or her designee shall have the authority to issue civil penalty assessments for the violations enumerated in section 40-7-113.5, subject to hearing before the commission as set forth in this section. When a public utility is cited for a violation, the public utility shall be given notice of the violation in the form of a civil penalty assessment notice.

The notice shall be tendered by the director or his or her designee, either in person or by certified mail, or by personal service by any person authorized to serve process under rule 4 (d) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, and shall contain:

The name and address of the person cited for the violation;

A citation to the specific statute or rule alleged to have been violated;

A brief description of the alleged violation;

The date and approximate location of the alleged violation;

The maximum penalty amounts prescribed for the violation;

The date of the notice;

A place for the public utility to execute a signed acknowledgment of receipt of the civil penalty assessment notice;

A place for the public utility to execute a signed acknowledgment of liability for the violation; and

Any other information as may be required by law to constitute notice of a complaint to appear for hearing if the prescribed penalty is not paid within ten days.

Every cited public utility shall execute the signed acknowledgment of receipt of the civil penalty assessment notice. The acknowledgment of liability shall be executed at the time the public utility cited pays the prescribed penalty. The public utility cited shall pay the civil penalty specified for the violation involved at the office of the commission, either in person or by depositing the payment postpaid in the United States mail within ten days after the issuance of the citation.

If the public utility cited does not pay the prescribed penalty within ten days after the issuance of the notice, the civil penalty assessment notice shall constitute a complaint to appear before the commission. The public utility cited shall contact the commission on or before the time and date specified in the notice to set the complaint for a hearing on the merits in accordance with section 40-6-109. If the public utility cited fails to contact the commission on or before the time and date specified, the commission shall set the complaint for hearing. At the hearing, the commission shall have the burden of demonstrating a violation by a preponderance of the evidence.

A civil penalty assessment notice shall not be considered defective so as to provide cause for dismissal solely because of a defect in the content of the civil penalty assessment notice. Any defect in the content of a civil penalty assessment notice issued as described in subsection (1) of this section may be cured by a motion to amend the same filed with the commission prior to hearing on the merits; except that no such amendment shall be permitted if substantial rights of the public utility cited are prejudiced.

In the case of an alleged continuing violation for which daily penalties would accrue under section 40-7-115, the issuance of a civil penalty assessment notice shall toll the accrual of daily penalties until the later to occur of the expiration of the ten-day period provided for payment pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or, if the matter is set for hearing, upon the conclusion of the proceedings through issuance of an order, dismissal of the complaint, or other final agency action, including judicial review and appeal, if any.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the assessment of a civil penalty against an individual employee of a public utility.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p.1799, § 22, effective July 1.

40-7-117. Gas pipeline safety rules - civil penalty for violations - other remedies.

Any person violating any rule adopted or order issued by the commission pursuant to the authority granted in section 40-2-115 (1)(c), (1)(d), or (1)(e) is subject to a civil penalty of up to two hundred thousand dollars per violation; except that, in the case of a group or series of related violations, the aggregate amount of such penalties shall not exceed two million dollars. Each day of a continuing violation constitutes a separate violation.

Any civil penalty authorized by this section may be reduced by the commission based on consideration of objective metrics and factors set forth in rules. The metrics and factors must include:

An evaluation of the severity of the violation, in terms of its actual or potential effect on public safety or pipeline system integrity;

The extent to which the violation and any underlying conditions that may have contributed to the likelihood or severity of the violation have been remedied; and

The extent to which the violator agrees to spend, in lieu of payment of part of the civil penalty, a specified dollar amount on commission-approved measures to reduce the overall risk to pipeline system safety or integrity; except that the amount of the penalty payable to the commission shall be no less than five thousand dollars.

If a violator does not remit the assessed penalty or the lesser amount agreed upon pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the commission may recover the amount due plus court costs in a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

The remedy provided in this section is in addition to any other remedies available to the commission under the constitution or laws of this state or of the United States.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 2071, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1700, § 6, effective May 14.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-108), ch. 465, p. 3355, § 3, effective July 6.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-108, see section 1 of chapter 465, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

40-7-118. Legal services offset fund - creation - exemption from maximum reserve.

The legal services offset fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of the civil penalties that are collected and credited to the fund pursuant to section 40-7-112 (1)(b) for violations of article 10.1 of this title 40 or commission rules promulgated pursuant to article 10.1 of this title 40. The money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the department of regulatory agencies for use to offset the costs of legal representation of the staff of the commission in proceedings before the commission concerning the enforcement of article 10.1 of this title 40. The department of regulatory agencies shall use the money in the legal services offset fund to support appropriations made to the department that are used for legal representation of the staff of the commission in proceedings concerning the enforcement of article 10.1 of this title 40.

The money in the fund and any interest earned on money in the fund at the end of any fiscal year remains in the fund and shall not be transferred to the general fund or any other fund; except that, if the balance in the fund exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer the money in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the general fund.

In accordance with section 24-75-402 (2)(a) and for each fiscal year, the alternative maximum reserve for the legal services offset fund is two hundred fifty thousand dollars.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-180), ch. 281, p. 1532, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3312, § 18, effective May 30.